Wyoming statutes. Title 41 Water
Division 1. Generally

§ 41-9-201.
Authority of commissioners to enter lands for repairs.

The commissioners, their agents, servants and employees shall have the right to go upon all lands along any drain, ditch, levee or embankment in their district, to inspect, deepen, widen and repair the same whenever necessary, doing no unnecessary damage, and shall not be liable for trespass therefor.

History.

Laws 1911, ch. 95, § 70; C.S. 1920, § 1065; R.S. 1931, § 122-868; C.S. 1945, § 71-1531; W.S. 1957, § 41-392.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Discrimination between property within and that outside municipality or other governmental district as to rates for use of drains or sewers, 4 ALR2d 595.

Liability of drainage district for personal injuries, 32 ALR2d 1060.

Municipal liability arising from negligence or other wrongful act in connection with construction or repair, 61 ALR2d 666.

Liability of abutting landowner for injury to municipal employee engaged in constructing or repairing sewers or drains, 58 ALR3d 1085.

§ 41-9-202.
Power of eminent domain.

Any drainage district created and existing under W.S.

41-9-101

through

41-9-278

may, whenever it shall require a way of necessity outside its boundaries for any of its work or works theretofore authorized by the court, proceed to procure the same by the exercise of the power of eminent domain.

History.

Laws 1921, ch. 166, § 13; R.S. 1931, § 122-883; C.S. 1945, § 71-1546; W.S. 1957, § 41-393; Laws 1981, ch. 174, § 2.

Law reviews. —

For comment, “The Use of Opinion Testimony for Valuing Real Property in an Eminent Domain Suit,” see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 43 (1984).

For case note, “Water Rights — Impairment of Existing Water Rights Under the Wyoming Watershed Act. Associated Enters., Inc. v. Toltec Watershed Imp. Dist., 656 P.2d 1144,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 270

(Wyo. 1983),” see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 83 (1984).

§ 41-9-203.
Presumption of validity of acts of commissioners.

Commissioners of drainage districts are hereby declared to be public officers. The presumption shall be in favor of the regularity and validity of all their official acts. Whenever any report of the commissioners of any drainage district or any part of any such report is contested, remonstrated against or called in question, the burden of proof shall rest upon the contestant, remonstrant or questioner.

History.

Laws 1911, ch. 95, § 95; C.S. 1920, § 1090; R.S. 1931, § 122-902; C.S. 1945, § 71-1565; W.S. 1957, § 41-394.

Cited

in

W.S. Dickey Clay Mfg. Co. v. Bullock, 28 Wyo. 265, 202 P. 1104,

1922 Wyo. LEXIS 22

(1922).

§ 41-9-204.
Commissioners under supervision of court; removal; new bonds.

The court shall at all times have supervision of said commissioners, and may at any time require them to make a report on any matter or matters connected with their duties as commissioners, and after due hearing may remove from office any or all of said commissioners for neglect of duty or malfeasance in office or for other good cause. The court may at any time require the commissioners to give new bonds to the clerk of the court and may fix the amount thereof, and said bonds shall be submitted to the court or the presiding judge thereof for approval.

History.

Laws 1911, ch. 95, § 92; C.S. 1920, § 1087; R.S. 1931, § 122-899; C.S. 1945, § 71-1562; W.S. 1957, § 41-395.

Cited

in

W.S. Dickey Clay Mfg. Co. v. Bullock, 28 Wyo. 265, 202 P. 1104,

1922 Wyo. LEXIS 22

(1922).

§ 41-9-205.
Waiver of notice.

In case of failure to serve any notice of any proceeding or hearing in this chapter provided for, upon any person or corporation, such person or corporation, may appear in open court and waive such defect of service, or may waive it by filing in court or delivering to the commissioners of the drainage district to be filed in court a written waiver of such defect, in which waiver said defect shall be described; which waiver shall be signed by such party and witnessed and acknowledged before a proper officer having power to take acknowledgments of deeds.

History.

Laws 1911, ch. 95, § 96; C.S. 1920, § 1091; R.S. 1931, § 122-903; C.S. 1945, § 71-1566; W.S. 1957, § 41-396.

Cross references. —

As to officers authorized to administer oaths, see §

1-2-102

.

Editor's notes. —

The words “this chapter” refer to Laws 1911, ch. 95, which appears herein as §§

41-9-101

through

41-9-201

,

41-9-203

through

41-9-245

,

41-9-247

through

41-9-252

,

41-9-254

through

41-9-258

, and

41-9-260

through

41-9-273

.

§ 41-9-206.
Liberal construction.

The provisions of this act shall be liberally construed to promote the public health and welfare by reclaiming wet or overflowed lands, building embankments or levees and the preservation of any system of drainage heretofore constructed according to law.

History.

Laws 1911, ch. 95, § 98; C.S. 1920, § 1093; R.S. 1931, § 122-905; C.S. 1945, § 71-1568; W.S. 1957, § 41-397.

Meaning of “this act.” —

The words “this act” refer to Laws 1911, ch. 95. As to disposition of the chapter, see Editor's note to §

41-9-205

.